Utah statutes.
61-2d-110.   Encouraging default prohibited.

(1)  A lender may not recommend or encourage default or nonpayment leading to foreclosure on an existing loan or other debt prior to and in connection with the closing or planned closing of a high-cost mortgage that refinances all or any portion of such existing loan or debt.

(2)  This section applies to all loans.



Enacted by Chapter 252, 2004 General Session

